Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
311D]

INTERSTATE
COMPACT ON EDUCATIONAL

OPPORTUNITY
FOR MILITARY CHILDREN

Section

311D-1 Enactment of compact

311D-2 State council

311D-3 Appointment of compact commissioner

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next